ja: フィンマウントシステム: 2ホール; 4ホール; ボルトスルー; Click'n'Go; FCS; FCS II; Futures; ネジ留め式; トラックシステム; その他
pl: System mocowania płetwy: 2 otwory; 4 otwory; Śruba przelotowa; Click'n'Go; FCS; FCS II; Futures; Przykręcany; Szynowy; Inny
ko: 핀 장착 시스템: 2홀; 4홀; 볼트 스루; Click'n'Go; FCS; FCS II; Futures; 스크류온; 트랙 시스템; 기타
ro-RO: Sistemul de montare a înotătoarei: Cu 2 orificii; Cu 4 orificii; Prindere cu șurub trecător; Click'n'Go; FCS; FCS II; Futures; Cu înșurubare; Sistem pe șină; Altele
es: Sistema de montaje de aletas: 2 agujeros; 4 agujeros; Atornillado; Click'n'Go; FCS; FCS II; Futures; Enroscable; Sistema de riel; Otro
pt-BR: Sistema de montagem da quilha: 2 furos; 4 furos; Parafusada através da prancha; Click'n'Go; FCS; FCS II; Futures; Parafusada; Sistema de trilho; Outro
en: Fin mounting system: 2-hole; 4-hole; Bolt-through; Click'n'Go; FCS; FCS II; Futures; Screw-on; Track system; Other
zh-CN: 鳍片安装系统: 2 孔; 4 孔; 螺栓贯穿固定; Click'n'Go; FCS; FCS II; Futures; 螺钉固定; 轨道系统; 其他
sv: Fästsystem för fena: 2-håls; 4-håls; Genomgående bult; Click'n'Go; FCS; FCS II; Futures; Påskruvad; Spårsystem; Övrigt
ru: Система крепления плавника: На 2 болта (2-hole); На 4 болта (4-hole); Сквозной болт; Click'n'Go; FCS; FCS II; Futures; На винтах; Рельсовая система (Track system); Другое
it: Sistema di montaggio della pinna: A 2 fori; A 4 fori; Passante imbullonato; Click'n'Go; FCS; FCS II; Futures; Da avvitare; Sistema a binario; Altro
th: ระบบติดตั้งครีบ: แบบ 2 รู; แบบ 4 รู; แบบร้อยนอต; Click'n'Go; FCS; FCS II; Futures; แบบขันสกรู; ระบบราง; อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Sistema de fixação da quilha: 2 furos; 4 furos; Aparafusado; Click'n'Go; FCS; FCS II; Futures; De enroscar; Sistema de calha; Outro
tr: Fin montaj sistemi: 2 delikli; 4 delikli; Geçme cıvatalı; Click'n'Go; FCS; FCS II; Futures; Vidalı; Ray sistemi; Diğer
nb: Monteringssystem for finne: 2-hulls; 4-hulls; Gjennomgående bolt; Click'n'Go; FCS; FCS II; Futures; Skrus på; Skinnesystem; Annet
lt-LT: Peleko montavimo sistema: 2 skylių; 4 skylių; Prisukamas varžtais; „Click'n'Go“; FCS; FCS II; „Futures“; Užsukamas; Bėgių sistema; Kita
de: Befestigungssystem der Finne: 2-Loch; 4-Loch; Bolt-Through; Click'n'Go; FCS; FCS II; Futures; Zum Aufschrauben; Schienensystem; Sonstige
sl-SI: Sistem montaže plavuti: 2 luknji; 4 luknje; Vijak skozi; Click'n'Go; FCS; FCS II; Futures; Na privijanje; Sistem z vodili; Drugo
el: Σύστημα τοποθέτησης πτερυγίου: 2 οπών; 4 οπών; Διαμπερές βίδωμα; Click'n'Go; FCS; FCS II; Futures; Βιδωτό; Σύστημα με ράγες; Άλλο
hu: Uszony rögzítési rendszere: 2-lyukú; 4-lyukú; Átmenő csavaros; Click'n'Go; FCS; FCS II; Futures; Felcsavarozható; Sínes rendszer; Egyéb
zh-TW: 蛙鞋安裝系統: 2 孔; 4 孔; 貫穿螺栓; Click'n'Go; FCS; FCS II; Futures; 旋入式; 軌道系統; 其他
sk-SK: Systém pripevnenia plutvy: S 2 otvormi; S 4 otvormi; Priechodná skrutka; Click'n'Go; FCS; FCS II; Futures; Naskrutkovacie; Koľajnicový systém; Iné
fi: Evän kiinnitysjärjestelmä: 2-reikäinen; 4-reikäinen; Läpipultattava; Click'n'Go; FCS; FCS II; Futures; Ruuvattava; Kisko; Muu
vi: Hệ thống gắn vây: 2 lỗ; 4 lỗ; Bắt vít xuyên qua; Click'n'Go; FCS; FCS II; Futures; Bắt vít; Hệ thống rãnh trượt; Khác
bg-BG: Система за монтаж на финките: С 2 отвора; С 4 отвора; С болт; Click'n'Go; FCS; FCS II; Futures; С винт; Система с релса; Други
hr-HR: Sustav montaže peraje: 2 rupe; 4 rupe; S vijkom; Click'n'Go; FCS; FCS II; Futures; Na uvrtanje; Sustav tračnica; Ostalo
cs: Systém upevnění ploutve: 2 otvory; 4 otvory; Průchozí šroub; Click'n'Go; FCS; FCS II; Futures; Šroubovací; Kolejnicový systém; Jiné
nl: Montagesysteem vin: 2-gats; 4-gats; Doorgeschroefd; Click'n'Go; FCS; FCS II; Futures; Opschroefbaar; Tracksysteem; Overig
fr: Système de fixation des ailettes: À 2 trous; À 4 trous; Traversant; Click'n'Go; FCS; FCS II; Futures; À visser; Système de rail; Autre
da: Finnemonteringssystem: 2-huls; 4-huls; Gennemgående bolt; Click'n'Go; FCS; FCS II; Futures; Til påskruning; Skinnesystem; Andet